California statutes. Public Resources Code
 the final performance standard for the discharge of ballast water of zero detectable living organisms for all organism size classes no later than January 1, 2040. If, based on a review of ballast water treatment technologies submitted in a report to the Legislature in conformance with provisions of subdivision (b), achievement of the final performance standard becomes practicable sooner than January 1, 2040, the commission shall establish an earlier effective date in regulation.

(b) (1) If a ballast water treatment system has stopped operating properly during a voyage, the master, owner, operator, or person in charge of the vessel shall report the problem to the commission as soon as practicable.

(2) The commission shall consult with the United States Coast Guard
 to attempt to identify an alternative, environmentally sound method of ballast water management under the circumstances described in paragraph (1) in accordance with Section 151.2040(b) of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 

(3) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of the vessel subject to paragraph (1) shall employ the alternative, environmentally sound method of ballast water management identified by the commission in consultation with the United States Coast Guard before discharging ballast water in California waters.

(c) (1) Not less than 18 months before January 1, 2030, and January 1, 2040, the commission, in consultation with the board, the United States Coast Guard, and an
 advisory panel described in paragraph (3), shall prepare, or update, and submit to the Legislature a report on the efficacy, availability, and environmental impacts, including the effect on water quality, of currently available technologies for ballast water treatment systems. If technologies to meet the performance standards are determined in a review to be unavailable, the commission shall include in that review an assessment of why the technologies are unavailable.

(2) The advisory panel described in paragraph (3) shall make recommendations regarding the content and issuance of the report and implementation of the performance standards to the commission.

(3) (A) The advisory panel shall include, but not be limited to, representatives from one or more
 state regional water quality control boards, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the United States Coast Guard, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and other persons representing shipping, port, conservation, fishing, aquaculture, agriculture, and public water agency interests. The commission shall ensure that the advisory panel meets in a manner that facilitates the effective participation of both the public and private members. The advisory panel’s meetings shall be open to the public.

(B) The commission shall provide notice of the advisory panel’s meetings to any person who requests that notice in writing, as well as on the commission’s internet website. The commission shall provide that notice at least 10 days before an advisory panel meeting and shall include the meeting’s agenda and the name, address, and
 telephone number of a person who can provide additional information before the meeting.

(4) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2034, for the interim performance standard, and January 1, 2044, for the final performance standard, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(B) A report required to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 770, Sec. 2.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

71206.

(a) The commission, in coordination with the United States Coast Guard, shall take samples of ballast water, sediment, and biofouling from and inspect at least 25 percent of the arriving vessels subject to this division, examine documents, and make other appropriate inquiries to assess the compliance of any vessel subject to this division. The commission shall provide to the board copies of all sampling results.

(b) The master, owner, operator, or person in charge of a vessel subject to this division shall make available to the commission, upon request of that commission, the records required to be maintained by this division.

(c) The commission, in coordination with the United States Coast Guard, shall compile the information obtained from submitted reports. The information shall be used, in conjunction with existing information relating to the number of vessel arrivals, to assess vessel reporting rates and compliance with the requirements of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 644, Sec. 7.   (AB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71207.

(a) Nothing in this division restricts a state or local agency, board, commission, or department, or a subdivision of one of those entities, from enforcing this division, if the total fines imposed by those entities do not exceed the amount of the fines set forth in Section 71216.

(b) A person who violates this division is subject to civil and criminal liability in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 71216).

(c) The commission may require a vessel operating in violation of this division to depart the waters of the state and exchange, treat, or otherwise manage the ballast water or biofouling, or both, at
 a location determined by the commission, unless the master determines that the departure or exchange would threaten the safety or stability of the vessel, its crew, or its passengers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 644, Sec. 8.   (AB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71210.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the board, the United States Coast Guard, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and a technical advisory group made up of interested persons, including, but not limited to, shipping and port representatives, shall sponsor pilot programs for the purpose of evaluating alternatives for treating and otherwise managing ballast water and biofouling. The goal of this effort shall be the meaningful participation of the State of California in federal rulemaking actions and the reduction or elimination of the discharge of nonindigenous species into the coastal waters of the state or into waters that may impact coastal waters of the state. Whenever possible, the pilot programs shall include funding from federal grants and appropriations, vendor funding, and state bond funds, including,
 but not limited to, bond funds from the Water Security, Clean Drinking Water, Coastal and Beach Protection Act of 2002. Priority shall be given to projects to test and evaluate treatment technologies that can be used to prevent the introduction and spread of nonindigenous aquatic species into coastal waters of the state by ship-mediated vectors.

(b) (1) The commission shall provide biennial summaries to the Legislature and the public, beginning on or before January 31, 2005, of the results of the pilot programs conducted pursuant to this section. These summary reports shall include, but not be limited to, a description of the projects, the relative effectiveness of the technologies examined in minimizing the discharge of nonindigenous species, and the costs of implementing the technologies.

(2) The summary reports required by this subdivision shall be in
 compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 443, Sec. 8.   (AB 912)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Research and Program Evaluation [71211. - 71213.]

71211.

(a) (1) The Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the commission and the United States Coast Guard, shall collect data necessary to establish and maintain an inventory of the location and geographic range of nonindigenous species populations in the coastal and estuarine waters of the state that includes open coastal waters and bays and estuaries. In particular, data shall be collected that does both of the following:

(A) Supplements the existing baseline of nonindigenous species previously developed pursuant to this section, by adding data from investigations of intertidal and nearshore subtidal habitats along the open coast.

(B) Monitors the coastal and estuarine
 waters of the state, including, but not limited to, habitats along the open coast, for new introductions of nonindigenous species or spread of existing nonindigenous species populations.

(2) Whenever possible, the study shall use appropriate, existing data, including data from previous studies made pursuant to this section. The Department of Fish and Wildlife shall make the inventory and accompanying analysis available to the public through the Internet on or before January 1, 2007, and annually shall provide to the public an update of that inventory.

(b) (1) The Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with the commission and the United States Coast Guard, shall assess the effectiveness of the ballast water and biofouling controls implemented pursuant to this division by comparing the status and establishment of nonindigenous species populations, as
 determined from the data collected pursuant to subdivision (a), with the baseline data collected pursuant to this division and submitted in a report to the Legislature in 2003.

(2) Whenever possible, this research shall utilize appropriate, existing data.

(c) Information generated by the research conducted pursuant to this section shall be of the type and in a format useful for subsequent studies and reports undertaken for any of the following purposes:

(1) The determination of alternative discharge zones.

(2) The identification of environmentally sensitive areas to be avoided for uptake or discharge of ballast water.

(3) The long-term effectiveness of biofouling management and ballast
 water discharge control measures.

(4) The determination of potential risk zones where uptake or discharge of ballast water shall be prohibited.

(5) The rate and risk of establishment of nonindigenous species in the coastal waters of the state, and resulting impacts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 24.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

71212.

On or before January 31, 2005, and updated triennially, the commission, in consultation with the board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the United States Coast Guard, shall submit to the Legislature, and make available to the public, a report that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(a) A summary of the information provided in the ballast water management report forms submitted to the commission, including the volumes of ballast water managed, volumes discharged into state waters, types of ballast water treatment, and locations at which ballast water was loaded and discharged.

(b) Monitoring and inspection
 information collected by the commission pursuant to this division, including a summary of compliance rates, categorized by geographic area and other groupings as information allows.

(c) An analysis of the monitoring and inspection information, including recommendations for actions to be undertaken to improve the effectiveness of the monitoring and inspection program.

(d) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the measures taken to reduce or eliminate the discharge of nonindigenous species from vessels, including recommendations regarding action that should be taken to improve the effectiveness of those measures.

(e) A summary of the research completed during the three-year period that precedes the release of the report, and
 ongoing research, on the release of nonindigenous species by vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 11.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

71212.1.

On or before April 30, 2026, and updated semiannually, the commission shall publish on its internet website both of the following:

(a) A summary of the information provided in the ballast water management report forms submitted to the commission, including vessel arrival data indicating vessel type and arrival port, and volumes of ballast water discharged into state waters by vessel type and arrival port.

(b) Inspection and compliance rates for vessels, as available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 102, Sec. 12.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

71213.

(a) The commission, the board, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife, in consultation with interested stakeholders, shall identify and conduct any other research determined necessary to carry out the requirements of this division. The research may relate to the transport and release of nonindigenous species by vessels, the methods of sampling and monitoring of the nonindigenous species transported or released by vessels, the rate or risk of release or establishment of nonindigenous species in the waters of the state and resulting impacts, and the means by which to reduce or eliminate a release or establishment. The research shall focus on assessing or developing methodologies for treating or otherwise managing ballast water and biofouling to reduce or eliminate the discharge or establishment of nonindigenous species.

(b) The commission may also take samples of ballast water, sediment, and biofouling from arriving vessels subject to this division for research purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 443, Sec. 9.   (AB 912)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.  Marine Invasive Species Control Fund [71215. - 71215.]

71215.

(a) (1) The Marine Invasive Species Control Fund is hereby created. The money in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used solely to carry out this division.

(2) All money accruing to the Exotic Species Control Fund shall be transferred to the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund.

(b) (1) The commission shall administer the fund in accordance with this chapter.

(2) The commission shall establish, through regulation, a reasonable and appropriate fee solely for the purposes of carrying out this division. The fee
 may not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each voyage, as described in subdivision (c). This amount may be adjusted for inflation every two years.

(3) In establishing fees, the commission shall consult with a technical advisory group made up of interested persons, including, but not limited to, shipping and port representatives.

(4) The commission may establish lower levels of fees and the maximum amount of fees for individual shipping companies or vessels. Any fee schedule established, including the level of fees and the maximum amount of fees, shall take into account the impact of the fees on vessels operating from California in the Hawaii or Alaska trades, the frequency of calls by particular vessels to California ports within a year, the ballast water and biofouling management
 practices of the vessels, and other relevant considerations.

(c) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, in accordance with Part 22.5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall collect the fee from the owner or operator of each vessel, or the vessel agent acting on behalf of the owner or operator, that arrives at a California port or place from a port or place outside of California. That fee may not be assessed on any vessel arriving at a California port or place if that vessel comes directly from another California port or place and during that transit has not first arrived at a port or place outside California or moved outside the exclusive economic zone (EEZ) prior to arrival at the subsequent California port or place.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fees imposed pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all penalties and payments collected for violations of any requirements of this division shall be deposited into the Marine Invasive Species
 Control Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 8.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Civil and Criminal Penalties and Liability [71216. - 71217.]

71216.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), a person who intentionally or negligently fails to comply with the requirements of this division may be liable for an administrative civil penalty in an amount that shall not exceed twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($27,500) for each violation. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.

(b) A person who fails to comply with the reporting requirements set forth in Section 71205 may be liable for an administrative civil penalty in an amount that shall not exceed twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($27,500) per violation. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.

(c) A person who, knowingly and with intent to deceive, falsifies a ballast water or biofouling management report form required by this division, or knowingly and with intent to deceive, tampers with or disables a system for controlling the release of nonindigenous species, required by this division, may be liable for an administrative civil penalty in an amount that shall not exceed twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($27,500) per violation. Each day of a continuing violation constitutes a separate violation.

(d) The executive officer of the commission may issue a complaint to a person on whom civil liability may be imposed pursuant to this division. The complaint shall allege the facts or failures to act that constitute a basis for liability and the amount of the proposed civil liability. The complaint shall be served by personal service or certified mail and shall inform the
 person served of the right to a hearing. A person served with a complaint pursuant to this subdivision may, within 30 days after service of the complaint, request a hearing by filing with the executive officer a notice of defense, as described in Section 11506 of the Government Code. A notice of defense is deemed to be filed within the 30-day period if it is postmarked within the 30-day period. If a hearing is requested by the person, it shall be conducted within 30 days after the executive officer receives the notice of defense. If no notice of defense is filed within 30 days after service of the complaint, the executive officer shall issue an order setting liability in the amount proposed in the complaint unless the executive officer and the person have entered into a settlement agreement, in which case the executive officer shall issue an order setting liability in the amount specified in the settlement agreement. If the person has not filed a notice of defense or if the executive officer and the person
 have entered into a settlement agreement, the order shall not be subject to review by a court or agency.

(e) A hearing required pursuant to this section shall be conducted by an independent hearing officer, in accordance with the procedures specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except as otherwise specified in this section. In making a determination, the hearing officer shall take into consideration the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation, the violator’s past and present efforts to prevent, abate, or clean up conditions posing a threat to the public health and safety of the environment, and the violator’s ability to pay the proposed civil penalty. After conducting a hearing required pursuant to this section, the hearing officer shall, within 30 days after the case is submitted, issue a decision, including an order setting the amount, if any, of
 the civil penalty to be imposed.

(f) An order setting civil liability and issued pursuant to this section is effective and final upon issuance. The violator shall pay any penalty within 30 days of service, unless he or she seeks judicial review pursuant to subdivision (g), in which case he or she shall pay any penalty within 30 days of service of the court’s order setting civil liability. A copy of the order shall be served by personal service or by certified mail upon the person served with the complaint and upon other persons who appeared at the hearing and requested a copy.

(g) Within 30 days after service of a copy of a decision issued by the hearing officer that the person served is liable for a civil penalty, a person so served may file a petition for writ of mandate for review of the decision pursuant to Section 11523 of the Government Code. A person who fails to file the
 petition within the 30-day period shall not challenge the reasonableness or validity of a decision or order of the hearing officer in any judicial proceedings brought to enforce the decision or order or for other remedies. Except as otherwise provided in this section, Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern a proceeding conducted pursuant to this subdivision. In a proceeding pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall uphold the decision of the hearing officer if the decision is based upon substantial evidence in the whole record. The filing of a petition for writ of mandate shall not stay any corrective action required pursuant to this act or the accrual of any penalties assessed pursuant to this act. This subdivision does not prohibit the court from granting any appropriate relief within its jurisdiction.

(h) An order for administrative penalties entered pursuant to this section shall be subject to interest at the legal
 rate from the filing date of the complaint as specified in subdivision (d).

(i) A provision of this chapter or a ruling of the executive officer shall not be construed to limit, abridge, or supersede the power of the Attorney General, at the request of the executive officer, or upon his or her own motion, to bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enjoin a violation of this division, seek necessary remedial action by a person who violates this division, or seek civil and criminal penalties against a person who violates this division.

(j) In lieu of a complaint pursuant to subdivision (d) to impose administrative civil penalties set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the Attorney General, at the request of the commission, may bring an action in superior court, in the name of the people of the State of California, to enjoin a violation of this
 division, seek necessary remedial action by a person who violates this division, or seek civil penalties in the amounts set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 28.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

71217.

A person who violates subdivision (c) of Section 71216 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 491, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Repeal [71271. - 71271.]

71271.

If a federal program and regulations similar to the program and regulations developed pursuant to this division are established and implemented, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature within eight months of the implementation of the federal program. The report shall compare the federal program with the program described in this division and make a finding as to the federal program’s relative effectiveness in preventing the introduction of marine invasive species from vessels visiting California. The commission shall recommend repeal of the program described in this division only if it finds that the federal program is equally or more effective at implementing and funding effective controls on the release of aquatic invasive species into the waters of the state than the program described in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 292, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 37. CALIFORNIA ENDOWMENT FOR MARINE PRESERVATION [71500. - 71562.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations [71500. - 71500.]

71500.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The Pacific Ocean and its rich marine living resources are of great environmental, economic, aesthetic, recreational, educational, scientific, social, cultural, and historic importance to the people of California.

(2) California’s marine living resources depend on a
 healthy marine environment, which comprises open coastal waters as well as coastal estuaries, wetlands, rivers and streams, and lands within the coastal zone.

(3) Overfishing, coastal pollution, and other unsustainable marine activities have damaged marine fisheries, habitats, and ecosystems. Programs are needed to conserve, protect, restore, and enhance the marine resources of the state and to improve the environmental sustainability of marine-related activities and encourage those activities that are environmentally sustainable. These programs should be focused on, and coordinated with, efforts to reduce overfishing and coastal pollution and to support sustainable marine activities and improve the sustainability of all marine activities.

(4) The State of California recognizes the need to formulate its coastal and ocean resource management policies based on the best readily
 available scientific information and should utilize the University of California, the California State University, other institutions of higher learning, and marine science research institutions to the extent feasible to assist it in achieving that goal. 

(5) The California Ocean Resources Management Act of 1990 is designed to ensure that the state’s ocean resources are managed, conserved, and enhanced in a comprehensive and coordinated manner. The California Ocean Protection Act furthered that mission by establishing the Ocean Protection Council, whose duties include coordination of state activities to protect coastal waters and ocean ecosystems, establishment of a science advisory team of distinguished scientists from a range of disciplines related to coastal and ocean resources, and contracting with the California Ocean Science Trust and other academic and nonprofit organizations to carry out scientific and educational activities consistent
 with that act.

(6) The ability of the state to carry out the mission of the California Ocean Protection Act is constrained by the availability of funds appropriated in the state budget.

(7) It is in the interest of the people of the state to establish an endowment, which would be independent of the state’s budget process and would impose no cost on the General Fund of the state, to provide a stable and ongoing source of funding in perpetuity to conserve, protect, restore, and enhance the marine resources of the state in a manner that is consistent with the California Ocean Protection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Note:  Section 71275 is located in Division 34, Part 3.8, which follows Section 71155.  Sections 71300 through 71424 are located in Division 34, Parts 4 through 6.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [71520. - 71520.]

71520.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern the construction of this division:

(a) “Board” or “endowment board” means the Board of Directors of the California Endowment for Marine Preservation.

(b) “Endowment” means the California Endowment for Marine Preservation.

(c) “Exclusive economic zone (EEZ)” means the zone as measured from the mean high tide line seaward to 200 nautical miles as set forth in the Presidential Proclamation 5030 of March 10, 1983, in which the United States proclaimed jurisdiction over the resources of the ocean within 200 miles of the coastline.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit corporation qualified to do business in California, and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(e) “Open coastal marine resource” means those marine resources that use open coastal waters as their habitat.

(f) “Open coastal waters” means the area composed of the submerged lands of the state that are below the mean lower low water extending seaward to the boundaries of the exclusive economic zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Establishment and Governance [71530. - 71534.]

71530.

The California Endowment for Marine Preservation is hereby established. The endowment is subject to this division and to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code). If there is a conflict between this division and the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law, this division shall prevail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71531.

The endowment is governed by the Board of Directors of the California Endowment for Marine Preservation, consisting of the following members:

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) The Secretary for Environmental Protection.

(c) One member of the public appointed by the Governor.

(d) One member, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, who shall be an expert in marine fisheries from the University of California, the California State University, or other
 accredited university.

(e) One member, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, who shall be from a nonprofit public interest organization with an emphasis on marine conservation or sustainable consumptive recreational activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71532.

The term of office of each member of the board appointed pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive, of Section 71531 is six years. However, the term of office for the first board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 71531 is three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71533.

Any vacancy on the board shall be filled by the appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71534.

(a) The board shall conduct its initial meeting as soon as possible after incorporation.

(b) The board shall meet as often as required, but at least twice per year.

(c) Members of the board shall attend at least 50 percent of all duly convened meetings of the board in a calendar year. A member who fails to attend at least 50 percent of all duly convened meetings of the board in a calendar year forfeits membership on the board. The vacancy shall be filled pursuant to Section 71533.

(d) Members of the board shall receive no salary but members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive, of Section 71531 shall be paid one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each meeting and shall be reimbursed for all necessary travel expenses.

(e) The Ocean Protection Council shall provide staff services that the endowment board needs to carry out its duties pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Powers and Duties [71550. - 71556.]

71550.

(a) The members of the board first appointed shall serve as incorporators of the endowment and shall take whatever actions are necessary to establish the endowment pursuant to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) once a majority of the board is appointed.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the
 endowment not be incorporated until the endowment board has received its initial notice of application from the Department of Fish and Game, pursuant to Section 6610 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71551.

The California Endowment for Marine Preservation shall receive funds generated pursuant to the California Marine Resources Legacy Act (Article 2 (commencing with Section 6420) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 6 of the Fish and Game Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71552.

(a) The purpose of the endowment is to create a permanent source of funding for projects and programs that will conserve, protect, restore, and enhance the coastal and marine resources of the state, with an emphasis on open coastal marine resources, and that will improve the sustainability of marine activities and encourage and support environmentally sustainable marine activities. To achieve this objective, the endowment board may award grants to public agencies and
 nonprofit organizations to support any or all of the following activities:

(1) Applied research, including, but not limited to, monitoring and data collection in support of projects to conserve, protect, restore, and enhance the open coastal marine resources of the state. In so doing, the board shall take maximum advantage of the scientific research expertise available from the University of California, the California State University, other institutions of higher learning, and marine science research institutions with expertise in marine resource issues. No more than 10 percent of funds awarded by the endowment in any fiscal year shall be awarded for research.

(2) Projects in open coastal waters that enhance environmentally sustainable marine activities.

(3) Projects in open coastal waters to enhance the habitat for
 open coastal marine life, including, but not limited to, the identification, monitoring, and protection of important ecological areas.

(4) Enforcement programs that protect, conserve, and enhance natural resources and marine habitat in and adjacent to open coastal waters, including regulating the take of open coastal marine species and monitoring of open coastal marine species and habitat with an emphasis on innovative approaches.

(5) Programs to aid in the establishment of sustainable fishing levels, including, but not limited to, ecosystem-based management of forage species, and programs to reduce or prevent habitat damage in open coastal waters.

(6) Programs to monitor catch and bycatch and to reduce bycatch in fisheries managed by the State of California and by the United States.

(7) Programs, projects, and activities that are directly related to the conservation, protection, restoration, and enhancement of coastal and marine resources of the state, with an emphasis on open coastal marine resources, and that are authorized by either paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 35650 or by Section 75060.

(b) Funds provided by the endowment are not intended, and shall not be used, to supplant funding provided through the annual budget process to support existing obligations and activities related to coastal and marine resources.

(c) The endowment board may also do all of the following:

(1) Obtain grants from, and contract with, individuals and with private, local, state, and federal agencies, organizations, and institutions.

(2) Contract with, or make grants to, conservation and educational organizations; marine institutes; aquariums and museums; institutions of higher education; and local, state, and federal agencies to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(3) Loan funds to local, state, and federal agencies, organizations, and institutions to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(d) The endowment shall create a business plan for a five-year period. The endowment shall update the plan annually.

(e) On or before February 1 each year following incorporation, the endowment shall submit a report for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) The updated business plan created pursuant to subdivision (c).

(2) A comprehensive and detailed report of the endowment’s operations, activities, financial condition, and accomplishments under this section.

(3) A listing of each recipient of a grant from the endowment and the purposes and amount of that grant.

(4) A listing of any loan that the endowment has received and the plan for repaying the loan.

(5) A report of each independent audit required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 71560.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71553.

Members of the board and appropriate staff shall be available to testify before appropriate committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71554.

The endowment shall not contribute to, or otherwise support, any political party, candidate for elective public office, or ballot measure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71555.

The endowment may hire employees and may obtain legal counsel. No employee of the endowment is an employee of the State of California. No employee of the endowment is subject to Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of, or Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 3525) of, Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Employees of the endowment have the right to representation consistent with the federal National Labor Relations Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

71556.

The endowment shall coordinate its activities with the Department of Fish and Game, the California Coastal Commission, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the State Lands Commission, and appropriate federal agencies, including the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Minerals Management Service of the United States Department of the Interior. Nothing in this division limits the authority and responsibility of any of these agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Financial Transactions and Audits [71560. - 71562.]

71560.

(a) The endowment may receive charitable contributions or any sources of income that may be lawfully received, including loans from the state.

(b) The endowment shall administer any funds it receives in accordance with this division.

(c) (1) Except as